Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Soil and Water Conservation
262.660.
Rules and regulations.

The commission, with the approval of the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources, is hereby authorized to promulgate such other rules and regulations or methods of accounting as may be necessary or expedient to give effect to the purposes expressed in KRS

262.610

to

262.650

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 79; 1966, ch. 23, § 68; 2022 ch. 239, § 7, effective April 26, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/26/2022). The language in this statute has been modified in codification from the way it was enacted in order to reflect the Governor’s line-item veto of 2022 House Bill 604 ( 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 239, sec. 7).

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.